Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.08.357

Automatic registration—Enhanced driver's licenses and identicards—Application submission.

(1) For applicants served under RCW 29A.08.355, the application is submitted pursuant to RCW 29A.08.350 and marked as an automatic voter registrant.

(2) For each such application, the secretary of state must obtain a digital copy of the applicant's signature image from the department of licensing.

[ 2023 c 466 s 15; 2018 c 110 s 103.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2023 c 466 ss 3, 4, 6, 11, 13-16, and 20-23: See note following RCW 29A.08.030.

Effective date—2018 c 110 ss 101-107: See note following RCW 29A.08.355.

Short title—Findings—Intent—2018 c 110: See notes following RCW 29A.08.355.